Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-1004
District; petition; county clerk; notice; contents.

Whenever a petition as provided in section 46-1003 is filed with the county clerk, the county clerk shall thereupon give notice to the county board of the filing and pendency of such petition and the county board shall forthwith fix a time and place within thirty days after the date of filing of the petition for a hearing of the same, and the county clerk shall, at least seven days before the date fixed for such hearing, give or send by registered or certified mail written notice thereof to each of the petitioners and shall transmit to the Chief Water Officer one copy of the petition and notice of the time and place the same is set for consideration. The county clerk shall also, at least seven days before the date fixed for such hearing, cause to be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county a notice of the hearing. The published notice shall (1) define the boundaries of the proposed district; (2) state the time and place of hearing; (3) state that all owners of land within such boundaries may appear and be heard; and (4) state that a rural water district, if incorporated, shall have no power or authority to levy any taxes whatsoever.

Laws 1967, c. 279, § 4, p. 748;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 230;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 253.